test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nyu_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - ню: # Noun 'own child / (fin) oma lapsi' - partial paradigm /Type 1/ - nyú
     ню+N+Sg+Nom: ню
     ню+N+Sg+Acc: нюмʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Gen: нюʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Dat: нюнʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Loc: [нюхуна, нюхуня]
     ню+N+Sg+Abl: нюхуд
     ню+N+Sg+Pros: [нювна, нювня]
     ню+N+Du+Nom: нюхуʼ
     ню+N+Du+Acc: нюхуʼ
     ню+N+Du+Gen: нюхуʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Nom: нюˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Acc: ню
     ню+N+Pl+Gen: нюˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Dat: нюхуˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Loc: [нюхуˮна, нюхуˮня]
     ню+N+Pl+Abl: нюхут
     ню+N+Pl+Pros: [нюˮумна, нюˮумня]
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: нюв
     ню+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: нюв
     ню+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: нюн
     ню+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: нюхун
     ню+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [нюхунан, нюхунян]
     ню+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: нюхудан
     ню+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [нювнан, нювнян]
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: нюхуюн
     ню+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: нюхуюн
     ню+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: нюхуюн
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: нюн
     ню+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: нюн
     ню+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: нюˮун
     ню+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: нюхуˮн
     ню+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [нюхуˮнан, нюхуˮнян]
     ню+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: нюхутан
     ню+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [нюˮумнан, нюˮумнян]
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: нюр
     ню+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: нюмд
     ню+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: нюнд
     ню+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: нюхунд
     ню+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [нюхунанд, нюхунянд]
     ню+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: нюхуданд
     ню+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: [нювнанд, нювнянд]
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: нюхуюд
     ню+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: нюхуюд
     ню+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: нюхуют
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: нюд
     ню+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: нюд
     ню+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: нют
     ню+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: нюхут
     ню+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [нюхуˮнат, нюхуˮнят]
     ню+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: нюхутат
     ню+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: [нюˮумнат, нюˮумнят]
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [нюда, нюдя]
     ню+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: [нюмда, нюмдя]
     ню+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: [нюнда, нюндя]
     ню+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: нюхунда
     ню+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [нюхунанда, нюхунянда]
     ню+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: нюхуданда
     ню+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: [нювнанда, нювнянда]
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: нюхуюда
     ню+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: нюхуюда
     ню+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: нюхуюта
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [нюда, нюдя]
     ню+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [нюда, нюдя]
     ню+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [нюта, нютя]
     ню+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: нюхута
     ню+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [нюхуˮната, нюхуˮнята]
     ню+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: нюхутата
     ню+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: [нюˮумната, нюˮумнята]
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: нюмиʼ
#     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: нюми
     ню+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: нюмиʼ
#     ню+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: нюми
     ню+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: нюниʼ
#     ню+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: нюни
     ню+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: нюхуниʼ
#     ню+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: нюхуни
     ню+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [нюхунаниʼ, нюхуняниʼ]
#     ню+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: [нюхунани, нюхуняни]
     ню+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: нюхуданиʼ
#     ню+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: нюхудани
     ню+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: [нювнаниʼ, нювняниʼ]
#     ню+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: [нювнани, нювняни]
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: нюхуюниʼ
#     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: нюхуюни
     ню+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: нюхуюниʼ
#     ню+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: нюхуюни
     ню+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: нюхуюниʼ
#     ню+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: нюхуюни
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: нюниʼ
#     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: нюни
     ню+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: нюниʼ
#     ню+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: нюни
     ню+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: нюˮниʼ
#     ню+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: нюˮни
     ню+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: нюхуˮниʼ
#     ню+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: нюхуˮни
     ню+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [нюхуˮнаниʼ, нюхуˮняниʼ]
#     ню+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: [нюхуˮнани, нюхуˮняни]
     ню+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: нюхутаниʼ
#     ню+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: нюхутани
     ню+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: [нюˮумнаниʼ, нюˮумняниʼ]
#     ню+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: [нюˮумнани, нюˮумняни]
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: нюриʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: нюмдиʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: нюндиʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: нюхундиʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [нюхунандиʼ, нюхуняндиʼ]
     ню+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: нюхудандиʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: [нювнандиʼ, нювняндиʼ]
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: нюхуюдиʼ
     ню+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: нюхуюдиʼ
     ню+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: нюхуютиʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: нюдиʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: нюдиʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: нютиʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: нюхутиʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [нюхуˮнатиʼ, нюхуˮнятиʼ]
     ню+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: нюхутатиʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: [нюˮумнатиʼ, нюˮумнятиʼ]
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: нюдиʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: нюмдиʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: нюндиʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: нюхундиʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [нюхунандиʼ, нюхуняндиʼ]
     ню+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: нюхудандиʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: [нювнандиʼ, нювняндиʼ]
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: нюхуюдиʼ
     ню+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: нюхуюдиʼ
     ню+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: нюхуютиʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: нюдиʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: нюдиʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: нютиʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: нюхутиʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [нюхуˮнатиʼ, нюхуˮнятиʼ]
     ню+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: нюхутатиʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: [нюˮумнатиʼ, нюˮумнятиʼ]
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: нюваˮ
     ню+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: нюваˮ
     ню+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: нюнаˮ
     ню+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: нюхунаˮ
     ню+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [нюхунанаˮ, нюхунянаˮ]
     ню+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: нюхуданаˮ
     ню+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: [нювнанаˮ, нювнянаˮ]
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: нюхуюнаˮ
     ню+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: нюхуюнаˮ
     ню+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: нюхуюнаˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: нюнаˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: нюнаˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: нюˮнаˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: нюхуˮнаˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: [нюхуˮнанаˮ, нюхуˮнянаˮ]
     ню+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: нюхутанаˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: [нюˮумнанаˮ, нюˮумнянаˮ]
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: нюраˮ
     ню+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: нюмдаˮ
     ню+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: нюндаˮ
     ню+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: нюхундаˮ
     ню+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [нюхунандаˮ, нюхуняндаˮ]
     ню+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: нюхудандаˮ
     ню+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: [нювнандаˮ, нювняндаˮ]
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: нюхуюдаˮ
     ню+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: нюхуюдаˮ
     ню+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: нюхуютаˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: нюдаˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: нюдаˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: нютаˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: нюхутаˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [нюхуˮнатаˮ, нюхуˮнятаˮ]
     ню+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: нюхутатаˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: [нюˮумнатаˮ, нюˮумнятаˮ]
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: [нюдоʼ, нюдёʼ]
     ню+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: [нюмдоʼ, нюмдёʼ]
     ню+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: [нюндоʼ, нюндёʼ]
     ню+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: нюхундоʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [нюхунандоʼ, нюхуняндоʼ]
     ню+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: нюхудандоʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: [нювнандоʼ, нювняндоʼ]
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: нюхуюдоʼ
     ню+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: нюхуюдоʼ
     ню+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: нюхуютоʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: [нюдоʼ, нюдёʼ]
     ню+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: [нюдоʼ, нюдёʼ]
     ню+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: [нютоʼ, нютёʼ]
     ню+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: нюхутоʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [нюхуˮнатоʼ, нюхуˮнятоʼ]
     ню+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: нюхутатоʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: [нюˮумнатоʼ, нюˮумнятоʼ]
     ню+N+Pred+Abs: нюд
     ню+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [нюдав, нюдув]
     ню+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [нюдав, нюдув]
     ню+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: нюдан
     ню+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: нюдар
     ню+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: нюдамд
     ню+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: нюданд
     ню+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [нюдада, нюдда]
     ню+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: нюдамда
     ню+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: нюданда
     ню+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [нюдамиʼ, нюдмиʼ]
#     ню+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [нюдами, нюдми]
     ню+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [нюдамиʼ, нюдмиʼ]
#     ню+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [нюдами, нюдми]
     ню+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [нюданиʼ, нюдниʼ]
#     ню+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [нюдани, нюдни]
     ню+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [нюдариʼ, нюдриʼ]
     ню+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: нюдамдиʼ
     ню+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: нюдандиʼ
     ню+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [нюдадиʼ, нюддиʼ]
     ню+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: нюдамдиʼ
     ню+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: нюдандиʼ
     ню+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [нюдаваˮ, нюдваˮ]
     ню+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [нюдаваˮ, нюдваˮ]
     ню+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [нюданаˮ, нюднаˮ]
     ню+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [нюдараˮ, нюдраˮ]
     ню+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: нюдамдаˮ
     ню+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: нюдандаˮ
     ню+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [нюдадоʼ, нюддоʼ]
     ню+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: нюдамдоʼ
     ню+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: нюдандоʼ
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: нюдмʼ
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: нюн
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ню
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: нюниʼ
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: нюдиʼ
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нюхуʼ
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: нюваˮ
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: нюдаˮ
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нюˮ
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: нюдамзь
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: нюнась
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: нюсь
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: нюнинзь
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: нюдинзь
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нюхунзь
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: нюваць
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: нюдаць
     ню+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: нюць
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нюв
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нюр
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [нюда, нюдя]
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нюмиʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нюриʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нюдиʼ
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нюваˮ
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: нюраˮ
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [нюдоʼ, нюдёʼ]
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: нювась
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: нюрась
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [нюдась, нюдясь]
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: нюминзь
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: нюринзь
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: нюдинзь
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: нюваць
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: нюраць
     ню+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [нюдонзь, нюдёнзь]
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нюхуюн
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нюхуюд
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нюхуюда
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нюхуюниʼ
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нюхуюдиʼ
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нюхуюдиʼ
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нюхуюнаˮ
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нюхуюдаˮ
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: нюхуюдоʼ
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нюхуюнась
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нюхуюдась
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нюхуюдась
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нюхуюнинзь
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нюхуюдинзь
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нюхуюдинзь
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нюхуюнаць
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нюхуюдаць
     ню+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: нюхуюдонзь
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нюн
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нюд
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [нюда, нюдя]
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нюниʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нюдиʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нюдиʼ
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нюнаˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: нюдаˮ
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [нюдоʼ, нюдёʼ]
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: нюнась
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: нюдась
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [нюдась, нюдясь]
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: нюнинзь
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: нюдинзь
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: нюдинзь
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: нюнаць
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: нюдаць
     ню+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [нюдонзь, нюдёнзь]
     ню+N+Tra: нюӈэ
     ню+N+Car: нюсиˮ
     ню+N+Equ: нюдремʼ
     ню+N+Equ+Lat: нюдревʼ
